Arkansas, session 2025, HB1139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-237. Released Time Education Act.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Released Time
Education Act".
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Released time course" means a course in religious moral
instruction that is taught by an independent entity for which a student is
excused from school to attend; and
(2) "School" means:
(A) A public school district; or
(B) An open-enrollment public charter school.
(c)(1) A school, upon request of the parent, legal guardian, or person
standing in loco parentis to an enrolled student, shall excuse the student
from school to attend a released time course.
(2) A student under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be
excused from school to attend the released time course for at least one (1)
hour each week but not more than five (5) hours each week.
*TNL024*
01/15/2025 8:32:00 AM TNL024